src/noun-fao-morph.txt
! =============== !
! Noun morphology !
! =============== !


! ----------------- !
! Basic noun lexica !
! ----------------- !

! Taken from the dictionary

! The nominal morphology is added in three layers.
! In this first one we add gender tags and morpho-
! phonological diacritics.
! The next two layers are for indefinite and definite
! suffixes, respectively.

! Compounds

LEXICON R
+Cmpnd#:   Nouns ;
           R- ;

LEXICON R-
+Cmpnd#:%- Nouns ;


LEXICON FINAL
+Cmpnd:%- # ; ! menningar- og granskingarskipan
          # ;

! Irregular

LEXICON k0
+N+Msc+Sg: FINAL ; ! januar

! Weak masculines.

LEXICON k1/3e
k1e ;
k3e ;

LEXICON k1/3
k1 ;
k3 ;

LEXICON k1/4
k1 ;
k4 ;

LEXICON k1e/48f !k1e/f84b Heini
k1e ;
k-flt48 ;

LEXICON k1 ! risi 
k1e ;
k-flt1 ;

LEXICON k1e
+N+Msc: W-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt1
+N+Msc: W-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLGEN ;


LEXICON k1_3stem
+N+Msc: W-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGDAT-mixed ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML W-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLGEN ;


LEXICON k2 ! beiggi
+N+Msc:%^JI W-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k3 ! hagi
k3e ;
k-flt3 ;

LEXICON k3e 
+N+Msc: W-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt3
+N+Msc: W-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML W-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k4 ! tanki
 k3 ;	! Same u-umlaut, but nasal cns

LEXICON k5 ! bóndi
+N+Msc:       W-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:       W-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:       W-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:       W-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML W-M-PLNOM-UR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML W-M-PLACC-UR ;
+N+Msc:       W-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:       W-M-PLGEN ;


! Strong masculines

LEXICON k6/7
k6 ;
k7 ;

LEXICON k6/8
k6 ;
k8 ;

LEXICON k6e/12e
k6e ;
k12e ;

LEXICON k6e/19e
k6e ;
k19e ;

LEXICON k7/6
k7 ;
k6 ;

LEXICON k8/11
k8 ;
k11 ;

LEXICON k8/17
k8 ;
k17 ;

LEXICON k8/17e
k8 ;
k17e ;

LEXICON k8/6
k8 ;
k6 ;

LEXICON k9/16
k9 ;
k16 ;

LEXICON k6 ! úlvur
k6e ;
k-flt6 ;

LEXICON k6e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt6
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;


LEXICON k7 ! sandur
k7e ;
k-flt7 ;

LEXICON k7e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;


LEXICON k-flt7
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt8
k-flt7 ;

LEXICON k8e
k7e ;

LEXICON k8 ! garður
 k7 ; ! Different u-umlaut
 
LEXICON k-flt9
k-flt6 ;

LEXICON k9e
k6e ;

LEXICON k9
 k6 ; ! Double consonant deletion in front of s
 
LEXICON k10/11
k10 ;
k11 ;

LEXICON k10
k10e ;
k-flt10 ;

LEXICON k10e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt10
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ; ! Double dative.
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k11/18
k11 ;
k18 ;

LEXICON k11 ! ísur
k11e ;
k-flt11 ;

LEXICON k11e/17f
k11e ;
k-flt17 ;

LEXICON k11e/26f
k11e ;
k-flt26 ;

LEXICON k11e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-NULL ;

LEXICON k-flt11
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;


! ir-stems

LEXICON k12/15
k12 ;
k15 ;

LEXICON k12/45
k12 ;
k45 ;
 
LEXICON k12/6f
k12 ;
k-flt6 ;

LEXICON k12 ! vinur
k12e ;
k-flt12 ;

LEXICON k12e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;

LEXICON k-flt12
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k13e
k12e ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;

LEXICON k13 ! vegur
 k12 ; ! As k12, plus a zero dative
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;

LEXICON k14 ! staður
k14e ;
k-flt14 ;

LEXICON k14e 
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;

LEXICON k-flt14
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k15/6
k15 ;
k6 ;

LEXICON k15 ! gestur
k15e ;
k-flt15 ;

LEXICON k15e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ; !s-gen

LEXICON k-flt15
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k16/27
k16 ;
k27 ;

LEXICON k16/9
k16 ;
k9 ;

LEXICON k16e
k15e ;

LEXICON k16
 k15 ; ! Double consonant

LEXICON k-flt17
k-flt15 ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;

LEXICON k17/8/6
k17 ;
k8 ;
k6 ;

LEXICON k17e
 k15e ;

LEXICON k17
 k15 ; ! Standard, but also u-umlaut
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;

LEXICON k18/11
k18 ;
k11 ;

LEXICON k18 ! dansur
k18e ;
k-flt18 ;

LEXICON k18e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-NULL ; ! s-final

LEXICON k-flt18
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;
 
LEXICON k19/12
k19 ;
k12 ;

LEXICON k19 ! meldur
k19e ;
k-flt19 ;

LEXICON k19e/15e
k19e ;
k15e ;

LEXICON k19e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt19 
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLGEN ;


LEXICON k20 ! akur
k20e ;
k-flt20 ;

LEXICON k20e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt20
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt21
k-flt19 ;

LEXICON k21/20
k21 ;
k20 ;

LEXICON k21e
k19e ;

LEXICON k21 ! stuðul
 k19 ; ! Can't see the diffrence ==> but:
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ; ! here is the difference

LEXICON k22e 
k19e ;

LEXICON k22 ! himmal
 k19 ; ! Can't see the diffrence

LEXICON k23/19
k23 ;
k19 ;

LEXICON k23e/19e
k23e ;
k19e ;

LEXICON k23 ! róður
k23e ;
k-flt23 ;

LEXICON k23e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGGEN-AR ;

LEXICON k-flt23
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k24/25
k24 ;
k25 ;

LEXICON k25/17f
k25 ;
k-flt17 ;

LEXICON k25/24
k25 ;
k24 ;

LEXICON k26/12
k26 ;
k12 ;

LEXICON k26/45
k26 ;
k45 ;

LEXICON k26/6f
k26 ;
k-flt6 ;

LEXICON k27/25
: k27 ;
k25 ;

LEXICON k28/12
k28 ;
k12 ;

LEXICON k28/23
k28 ;
k23 ;

LEXICON k28e/12e
k28e ;
k12e ;

LEXICON k3/1
k3 ;
k1 ;

LEXICON k32/9
k32 ;
k9 ;

LEXICON k4/1
k4 ;
k1 ;

LEXICON k45/6f
k45 ;
k-flt6 ;

LEXICON k6/12e
k6 ;
k12e ;

LEXICON k6/15
k6 ;
k15 ;

LEXICON k6e/12
k6e ;
k12 ;

LEXICON k3e/14f
k3e ;
k-flt14 ;

LEXICON k24 ! fløttur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k25 ! vøllur
k25e ;
k-flt25 ;

LEXICON k25e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-SGGEN-AR ;

LEXICON k-flt25
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k26 ! táttur
k26e ;
k-flt26 ;

LEXICON k26e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;

LEXICON k-flt26
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k27 ! vøkstur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k28 ! dráttur
k28e ;
k-flt28 ;

LEXICON k28e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGGEN-AR ;

LEXICON k-flt28
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k29 ! tráður

+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^IUMLr S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML%>r S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML%>r S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML%>r S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k30 ! fótur
k30e ;
k-flt30 ;

LEXICON  k30e 
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;

LEXICON k-flt30
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-UR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-UR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k31 ! veggur
k31e ;
k-flt31 ;

LEXICON k31e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:j S-M-SGGEN-AR ;

LEXICON k-flt31
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:j S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:j S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k32 ! ryggur
k31e ;
#+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
#+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
#+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
#+N+Msc:j S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;

k-flt31 ;
#+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
#+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC-IR ;
#+N+Msc:j S-M-PLDAT ;
#+N+Msc:j S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k33 ! hylur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k34 ! drongur
k34e ;
k-flt34 ;

LEXICON k34e
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt34
+N+Msc:%> S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%> S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLGEN ;


LEXICON k35 ! bonkur
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EIO S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%> S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%> S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%>j S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k36 ! heyggjur
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^GDEL S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k37 ! skógvur
k37e ;
k-flt37 ;

LEXICON k37e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^GVDEL S-M-SGGEN ;


LEXICON k-flt37 
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^GVDEL S-M-PLDATm ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k38 ! bógvur
k38e ;
k-flt38 ;

LEXICON k38e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^VDEL S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt38
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k39 ! sjógvur
k39e ;
k-flt39 ;

LEXICON k39e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-2 ;
+N+Msc:%^GDEL S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^GVDEL S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt39
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k40 ! hógvur
k40e ;
k-flt40 ;

LEXICON k40e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^GDEL S-M-SGGEN;

LEXICON k-flt40
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k41 ! maður
k41e ;
k-flt41 ;

LEXICON k41e
+N+Msc+Sg+Nom:maður DF-N-SGm ;
             :mann k41-obl ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Dat:monn%>u DF-D-PL ;

LEXICON k41-obl
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt41
+N+Msc:menn S-M-PLNOM-NULL-I-IR ;
+N+Msc:menn S-M-PLACC-NULL-I-IR ;
+N+Msc:mann S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k42 ! dagur
k42e ;
k-flt42 ;

LEXICON k42e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt42
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k43 ! faðir
k43e ;
k-flt43 ;

LEXICON k43e
!+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
!+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
!+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;
!+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;

+N+Msc:faðir S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc:faðir S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:faðir S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;
+N+Msc:faðir S-M-SGGEN ;
